Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-613
Business district, defined.

Business district shall mean the territory contiguous to and including a highway when within any six hundred feet along such highway there are buildings in use for business or industrial purposes, including, but not limited to, hotels, banks, office buildings, railroad stations, or public buildings which occupy at least three hundred feet of frontage on one side or three hundred feet collectively on both sides of a highway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 109.